Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [124D.701] FUNDING FOR SUCCESS INCENTIVE AID PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Funding for success program establishment. new text end new text begin The funding for success program is established to provide outcome-based incentive aid to schools that demonstrate success through metrics on graduation rates and recent graduate enrollment success rates. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Metrics for success. new text end new text begin (a) "Graduation rate multiplier" is determined by the percentage above 90 percent of students at a school who meet graduation requirements under section 120B.02, subdivision 2. Graduation rate data must be measured for the two preceding academic years. Each percentage point above 90 percent is worth a 0.1 multiplier, with a 90 percent graduation rate being zero and 100 percent graduation rate being one. new text end new text begin (b) "Recent graduate enrollment success rate multiplier" is determined by the percentage of a school's recent graduates who are enrolled in a public college or university with in-state tuition status who are not taking any remedial academic courses. Recent graduates are students who graduated in the two preceding academic years. Recent graduate enrollment success data must be measured for the two preceding academic years. Each percentage point above 90 percent is worth a 0.1 multiplier, with a 90 percent recent graduate enrollment rate without any remedial academic courses being zero and 100 percent graduation rate being one. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Funding for success. new text end new text begin (a) A school's funding for success incentive aid for fiscal year 2026 and later equals the ratio of: new text end new text begin (1) the product of: (i) the sum of the graduation rate multiplier under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), plus the recent graduate enrollment success rate multiplier under subdivision 2, paragraph (b); times (ii) the total enrollment of the school; and new text end new text begin (2) the total amount of funding for success incentive aid available to all schools. new text end new text begin (b) A school that does not meet either metric in subdivision 2 for having a graduation rate multiplier or recent graduate enrollment success rate multiplier above zero may not receive any funding for success incentive aid. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Funding for success incentive aid. new text end new text begin (a) For funding for success incentive aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.701: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The base for fiscal year 2028 is $....... new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end